North Carolina statutes. Chapter 17C. North Carolina Criminal Justice Education and Training Standards Commission.
Article 1. General.
§ 17C-10.
Required standards.

Criminal justice officers shall not be required to meet any requirement of subsections (b) and (c) of this section as a condition of continued employment, nor shall failure of any such criminal justice officer to fulfill such requirements make him ineligible for any promotional examination for which he is otherwise eligible if the criminal justice officer held a permanent appointment prior to June 1, 1986, and is an officer, supervisor or administrator of a local confinement facility; prior to March 15, 1973, and is a sworn law enforcement officer with power of arrest; prior to January 1, 1974, and is a State adult correctional officer; prior to July 1, 1975, and is a State probation/parole officer; prior to July 1, 1974, and is a State youth services officer; prior to January 15, 1980, and is a State probation/parole intake officer, prior to April 1, 1983, and is a State parole case analyst; prior to December 14, 1983, and is a State probation/parole officer-surveillance; or prior to February 1, 1987, and is a State probation/parole intensive officer.The legislature finds, and it is declared to be the policy of this Article, that such criminal justice officers have satisfied such entry level requirements by their experience. It is the intent of the Chapter that all criminal justice officers employed at the entry level after the Commission has adopted the required standards shall meet the requirements of this Article. All criminal justice officers who are exempted from the required entry level standards by this subsection shall be subject thereafter to the requirements of subsections (b) and (c) of this section as well as the requirements of G.S. 17C-6(a) in order to retain certification.If any criminal justice officer exempted from the required standards by this provision fails to serve as a criminal justice officer for a 12-month period, said officer shall be required to comply with the required entry level standards established by the Commission pursuant to the authority otherwise granted in this section and in G.S. 17C-6(a).

The Commission shall provide, by regulation, for a period of probationary employment and certification for criminal justice officers. The Commission may prescribe such training requirements as are required for the award of either probationary or permanent certification of officers, in addition to the pre-employment requirements authorized in G.S. 17C-6(a). Any criminal justice officer appointed on a temporary or probationary basis who does not comply with the training provisions of this Article is not authorized to exercise the powers of a criminal justice officer to include the power of arrest. If, however, a criminal justice officer has enrolled in a Commission-approved preparatory program of training that concludes later than the end of the officer’s probationary period, and the Commission does not require such training to be completed prior to the award of probationary certification, the Commission may extend, for good cause shown, the probationary period for a period not to exceed six months.Upon separation of a criminal justice officer from a criminal justice agency within the prescribed period of temporary or probationary appointment, the officer’s probationary certification shall be terminated by the Commission. Upon the reappointment to the same agency or appointment to another criminal justice agency of an officer who has separated from an agency within the probationary period, the officer shall be charged with the cumulative amount of time served during his initial or subsequent appointments and allowed the remainder of the probationary period to complete the Commission’s requirements. Upon reappointment to the same agency or appointment to another agency of an officer who has separated from an agency within the probationary period and who has remained out of service for more than one year after the date of separation, the officer shall be allowed another probationary period to satisfy the Commission’s requirements.

In addition to the requirements of subsection (b) of this section, the Commission, by rules and regulations, shall fix other qualifications for the employment, training, and retention of criminal justice officers including minimum age, education, physical and mental standards, citizenship, good moral character, experience, and such other matters as relate to the competence and reliability of persons to assume and discharge the responsibilities of criminal justice officers. The Commission shall prescribe the means for presenting evidence of fulfillment of these requirements. The Commission shall require the administration of a psychological screening examination, including a face-to-face, in-person interview conducted by a licensed psychologist, to determine the criminal justice officer’s psychological suitability to properly fulfill the responsibilities of the criminal justice officer. If face-to-face, in-person is not practicable, the face-to-face evaluation can be virtual as long as both the audio and video allow for a professional clinical evaluation in a clinical environment. The psychological screening examination shall be given (i) prior to the initial certification or (ii) prior to the criminal justice officer performing any action requiring certification by the Commission.Where minimum educational standards are not met, yet the individual shows potential and a willingness to achieve the standards by extra study, they may be waived by the Commission for the reasonable amount of time it will take to achieve the standards required. Such an educational waiver shall not exceed 12 months.

The Commission may issue a certificate evidencing satisfaction of the requirements of subsections (b) and (c) of this section to any applicant who presents such evidence as may be required by its rules and regulations of satisfactory completion of a program or course of instruction in another jurisdiction equivalent in content and quality to that required by the Commission for approved criminal justice education and training programs in this State.

History.

1971, c. 963, s. 1; 1979, c. 763, s. 1; 1981, c. 8; c. 400; 1983, c. 745, s. 3; 1989, c. 757, s. 6; 2018-5, s. 17.1(a); 2021-136, s. 1(c); 2021-138, s. 7(c).

§ 17C-10.1.
Certification of military service members and veterans with law enforcement training and experience.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the Commission shall waive an applicant’s completion of the Commission-accredited training course and issue probationary certification to a current or honorably discharged former military police officer provided the Commission, upon evaluating the individual applicant’s combined training and experience pursuant to

G.S. 93B-15.1(a)

, determines that the applicant’s combined training and experience is substantially equivalent to or exceeds the minimum expectations for employment as a law enforcement officer and the applicant satisfies all of the following conditions:

Successfully completed a military police training program and been awarded a military police occupational specialty rating.

Performed military police officer duties in any of the branches of military service, active or reserve, or the National Guard for not less than two of the five years preceding the date of the application for certification as a law enforcement officer.

Meets the minimum standards for law enforcement officers as set out in 12 NCAC 9B.0101 and 12 NCAC 9B.0111.

An applicant certified pursuant to subsection (a) of this section must successfully complete the employing agency’s in-service firearms training and qualification program prior to employment and shall serve a one-year period of probation. During the one-year period of probation, the applicant must successfully complete the Legal Unit and 24 hours of training in the service of civil process in a Commission-accredited Basic Law Enforcement Training Course and successfully pass the State Comprehensive Examination in its entirety.

The Commission shall issue certification to a current or honorably discharged former military police officer whose combined training and experience is not substantially equivalent to or does not exceed the minimum expectations for employment as a law enforcement officer if the applicant meets all of the following requirements:

Successfully completed a formal military basic training program and been awarded a military police occupational specialty rating.

Engaged in the active practice of military police officer duties in any of the branches of military service, active or reserve, or the National Guard for not less than two of the five years preceding the date of the application for certification as a law enforcement officer.

Meets the minimum standards for law enforcement officers as set out in 12 NCAC 9B.0101 and 12 NCAC 9B.0111.

Successfully completes the Legal Unit and 24 hours of training in the service of civil process in a Commission-accredited Basic Law Enforcement Training Course.

Successfully completes any supplementary high-liability training as deemed necessary by the Commission, not to exceed an additional 180 hours.

Obtains a passing grade on the State Comprehensive Basic Law Enforcement Training (BLET) Exam.

Members of the Air/Army National Guard and Military Reserve Components who have performed as a military police officer for not less than 1,040 hours during the five years preceding the date of application shall be deemed to satisfy the requirements of subdivision (2) of subsection (a) and subdivision (2) of subsection (c) of this section.

An applicant who, after completing the required training in subsection (a) or (c) of this section, fails to obtain a passing score on not more than two of the units of the comprehensive exam may be retested in the units the applicant failed. An applicant who fails three or more of the units must enroll in and successfully complete a subsequent offering of the Basic Law Enforcement Training Course in its entirety in order to be eligible to be certified.

An active duty military police officer who obtains certification under this section may retain the certification for the duration of active duty provided the officer continues to serve in a military police capacity and complies with any in-service training requirements as may be required by the Commission. An active duty member who is unable to complete annual in-service requirements due to deployment or overseas assignment shall have 12 months from the time the officer returns to the United States in which to complete any required in-service training. The officer shall retain the certification for a period of one year following separation from active duty.

As used in this section, the following terms mean:

Branches of military service. — The United States Armed Forces: Air Force; Army; Marine; Navy; active, reserve, Air/Army National Guard components; and the Coast Guard.

Combined training. — Basic military training, basic military police training, in-service or advanced military police training and, any other military training courses that may be applicable to the performance of law enforcement duties.

Military police. — All law enforcement occupational classifications in the various branches of the Armed Forces, including Military Police Officer, Security Forces Specialist, Master-at-Arms, Maritime Enforcement Specialist, Boarding Officer, and Security forces.

The Commission shall adopt rules to implement the provisions of this section.

History.

2015-49, s. 1; 2015-264, s. 37(a).

§ 17C-11.
Compliance; enforcement.

Any criminal justice officer who the Commission determines does not comply with this Article or any rules adopted under this Article shall not exercise the powers of a criminal justice officer and shall not exercise the power of arrest unless the Commission waives that certification or deficiency. The Commission shall enforce this section by the entry of appropriate orders effective upon service on either the criminal justice agency or the criminal justice officer.

(a1)

Any criminal justice training school, program, or course of instruction that the Commission determines does not comply with this Article, or any rules adopted under this Article, shall not continue to offer programs or courses of instruction unless the Commission waives that certification or deficiency. Any criminal justice instructor, school director, commission certified operator, and any commission certified instructor, who the Commission determines does not comply with this Article, or any rules adopted under this Article, shall not act as an instructor, school director, or operator unless the Commission waives that certification or deficiency. The Commission shall enforce this section by the entry of appropriate orders effective upon service on the criminal justice training school or the individual holding commission certification.

Any person who desires to appeal the proposed denial, suspension, or revocation of any certification authorized to be issued by the Commission shall file a written appeal with the Commission not later than 30 days following notice of denial, suspension, or revocation.

The Commission may appear in its own name and apply to courts having jurisdiction for injunctions to prevent violations of this Article or of rules issued pursuant thereto; specifically, the performance of criminal justice officer functions by officers or individuals who are not in compliance with the standards and requirements of G.S. 17C-6(a) and

G.S. 17C-10

. A single act of performance of a criminal justice officer function by an officer or individual who is performing such function in violation of this Article is sufficient, if shown, to invoke the injunctive relief of this section.

History.

1979, c. 763, s. 1; 1989, c. 757, s. 7; 2001-490, s. 1.3; 2009-546, s. 3; 2018-5, s. 17.1(a).

§ 17C-12.
Grants under the supervision of Commission and the State; donations and appropriations.

The Commission may accept for any of its purposes and functions under this Article any and all donations, both real and personal, and grants of money from any governmental unit or public agency, or from any institution, person, firm or corporation, and may receive, utilize and dispose of the same. Any arrangements pursuant to this section shall be detailed in an annual report of the Commission. Such report shall include the identity of the donor, the nature of the transaction, and the conditions, if any. Any money received by the Commission pursuant to this section shall be deposited in the State Treasury to the account of the Commission.

The Commission may authorize the reimbursement to each political subdivision of the State not exceeding sixty percent (60%) of the salary and of the allowable tuition, living and travel expenses incurred by the officers in attendance at approved training programs, providing said political subdivisions do in fact adhere to the selection and training standards established by the Commission.

The Commission by rules and regulations, shall provide for administration of the grant program authorized by this section. In promulgating such rules, the Commission shall promote the most efficient and economical program of criminal justice training, including the maximum utilization of existing facilities and programs for the purpose of avoiding duplication.

The Commission may provide grants as a reimbursement for actual expenses incurred by the State or political subdivision thereof for the provisions of training programs of officers from other jurisdictions within the State.

History.

1971, c. 963, ss. 8, 9; 1979, c. 763, s. 1; 2018-5, s. 17.1(a).

§ 17C-13.
Pardons; expunctions.

When a person presents competent evidence that he has been granted an unconditional pardon for a crime in this State, any other state, or the United States, the Commission may not deny, suspend, or revoke that person’s certification based solely on the commission of that crime or for an alleged lack of good moral character due to the commission of that crime.

Notwithstanding

G.S. 15A-145.4

or

G.S. 15A-145.5

, the Commission may gain access to a person’s felony conviction records, including those maintained by the Administrative Office of the Courts in its confidential files containing the names of persons granted expunctions. The Commission may deny, suspend, or revoke a person’s certification based solely on that person’s felony conviction, whether or not that conviction was expunged.

History.

1989, c. 757, s. 8; 2011-278, s. 3; 2012-191, s. 6.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2012-191, s. 6, effective December 1, 2012, added “or

G.S. 15A-145.5

” in subsection (b).

§ 17C-14.
Database of law enforcement officer certification suspensions and revocations.

The Commission shall develop and maintain a statewide database accessible to the public on its website that contains all revocations and suspensions of law enforcement officer certifications by the Commission.

History.

2021-138, s. 1(a).

§ 17C-15.
Database for law enforcement officer critical incident information.

The Division shall develop and maintain a statewide database for use by law enforcement agencies that tracks all critical incident data of law enforcement officers in North Carolina.

All law enforcement agencies in the State that employ personnel certified by the Commission shall provide any information requested by the Division to maintain the database required by subsection (a) of this section.

Information collected under this section that is confidential under State or federal law shall remain confidential.

A law enforcement officer who is reported to the Division as having been involved in a critical incident who disputes being involved in a critical incident has a right, prior to being placed in the database, to request a hearing in superior court for a determination of whether the officer’s involvement was properly placed in the database.

History.

2021-138, s. 3(b).

§ 17C-16.
Requirement to report material relevant to testimony.

Any person who is certified by the Commission or has received a conditional offer of employment and who has been notified that the person may not be called to testify at trial based on bias, interest, or lack of credibility shall report and provide a copy of that notification to the Criminal Justice Standards Division within 30 days of receiving the notification, except as provided in subsection (h) of this section. This requirement shall only apply if the person is notified by one of the following methods:

In writing by a superior court judge, district court judge, federal judge, district attorney, assistant district attorney, United States attorney, assistant United States attorney, or the person’s agency head.

In open court by a superior court judge, district court judge, or federal judge, and documented in a written order.

The report to the Division shall be in writing and shall state who notified the person that the person may not be called to testify at trial. A person required to report to the Division under subsection (a) of this section shall make the same report to the person’s agency head within 30 days of being notified that the person may not be called to testify at trial. An agency head who receives a report that a person in the agency has been notified that they may not be called to testify at trial shall also report the notification to the Division in writing within 30 days of the agency head’s receipt of that report.

A superior court judge, district court judge, federal judge, district attorney, assistant district attorney, United States attorney, or assistant United States attorney who notifies a person that they may not be called to testify at trial as provided in subsection (a) of this section shall report that notification to the Division and provide a copy of the written document or order within 30 days of notifying the person that they may not be called to testify at trial.

If the Division transfers to another agency the certification of any person required to report to the Division pursuant to subsection (a) of this section, the Division shall provide written notification to both the head of the new agency and the elected district attorney in the prosecutorial district where the agency is located that the person has been previously notified that the person may not be called to testify at trial. If the new agency receiving notification pursuant to this subsection is a State agency, the Division shall notify the elected district attorney in every prosecutorial district of the State.

If any person required to report to the Division pursuant to subsection (a) of this section is subsequently informed in writing that that notification has been rescinded, the person shall provide the Division a copy of that document. The provisions of subsection (d) of this section do not apply if the person required to report pursuant to subsection (a) of this section is subsequently informed in writing that the notification has been rescinded.

No later than March 1 each year, the Commission shall report to the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Justice and Public Safety regarding the number of individuals for whom the Division received a report required by subsection (a) of this section during the previous calendar year. The report shall include information for each case on whether a final agency decision has been entered pursuant to Chapter 150B of the General Statutes and what action, if any, has been taken against each certification. The report shall not include the name or any other identifying information of any person required to report pursuant to subsection (a) of this section.

The reports and notifications received by the Division pursuant to this section shall not be public record.

Any person who has received a notification that may meet the reporting requirement provided in subsection (a) of this section may apply for a hearing in superior court for a judicial determination of whether or not the person received a notification that the person may not be called to testify at trial based on bias, interest, or lack of credibility. This hearing is limited to reviewing whether (i) a person who is certified by the Commission or has received a conditional offer of employment, (ii) has been notified in writing by a superior court judge, district court judge, federal judge, district attorney, assistant district attorney, United States attorney, or assistant United States attorney; or notified in open court by a superior court judge, district court judge, or federal judge, and documented in a written order, and (iii) that notification states that the person may not be called to testify at trial based on bias, interest, or lack of credibility, not matters of law or admissibility. The person must provide notice of the hearing to the Division. One extension of 15 days will be added to the 30-day reporting requirement provided in subsection (a) of this section if notice of a hearing is received.

History.

2021-137, s. 3(a); 2021-138, s. 4(a).

§§ 17C-17 through 17C-19.

Reserved for future codification purposes.